Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
339D

ELECTRONIC
WASTE AND TELEVISION

RECYCLING
AND RECOVERY ACT

Part I. Definitions

Section

339D-1 Definitions

Part II. Electronic Waste Recycling

339D-2 Scope of products

339D-3 Sales prohibition

339D-4 Electronic device manufacturer
responsibility

339D-5 Retailer responsibility

339D-6 Department responsibility

Part III. General Provisions

339D-7 Regulatory authority

339D-7.5 Manufacturer and agent responsibilities;
regulatory

compliance

339D-8 Enforcement

339D-9 Administrative penalties; fees

339D-10
Electronic device recycling fund

339D-11 Financial and proprietary information;
report

339D-12 Federal preemption

Part IV. Television Recovery System

339D-21 Applicability

339D-22 Television manufacturers

339D-23 Television manufacturer responsibility

339D-24 Retailer responsibility

339D-25 Television recovery system

339D-26 Environmental management

339D-27 State procurement

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2009, c 183, §2.

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next